Utah statutes.
78A-6-515.   Mental health therapist.

(1)  When a mental health practitioner is to be appointed in a parental rights action to evaluate the mental health of a parent or a child, or to provide mental health services to a parent or a child, the court:

(a)  may appoint any mental health therapist, as defined in Section 58-60-102, which the court finds to be qualified;

(b)  may not refuse to appoint a mental health therapist for the reason that the therapist's recommendations in another case have not followed the recommendations of the Division of Child and Family Services or the Office of Guardian Ad Litem; and

(c)  shall give strong consideration to the parent's or guardian's wishes regarding the selection of a mental health therapist.

(2)  This section applies to all juvenile court proceedings involving:

(a)  parents and children; or

(b)  the Division of Child and Family Services.

